Massachusetts, session 194th, S2321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (l) of section 139 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, inserted
by section 55 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by striking out after the
words “other,” the words:- such solar.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (l) of said section 139 of said chapter 164, as so inserted, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “each,” each time it appears, the following
word:- solar.
of 1